Washington statutes.
RCW 36.165.090

Financing—Property owner authorizations.

The proposed C-PACER financing for a qualified project may authorize the property owner to:

(1) Purchase directly the related equipment and materials for the installation or modification of a qualified improvement; and

(2) Contract directly, including through lease, power purchase agreement, or other service contract, for the installation or modification of a qualified improvement.

[ 2020 c 27 s 10.]